Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.820

Acquisition and disposal of vehicles for commuter ride sharing by city employees.

The power of any city, town, county, other municipal corporation, or quasi municipal corporation to acquire, hold, use, possess, and dispose of motor vehicles for official business shall include, but not be limited to, the power to acquire, hold, use, possess, and dispose of motor vehicles for commuter ride sharing by its employees, so long as such use is economical and advantageous to the city, town, county, other municipal corporation.

[ 1979 c 111 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 111: See note following RCW 46.74.010.

Ride sharing: Chapter 46.74 RCW.